Massachusetts, session 194th, H3212.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2A of Chapter 59 is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following
subsection:
(d) Whenever a Massachusetts Assessor deems it reasonably necessary to enter upon a
property to collect physical and functional data pertinent to its proper determination of fair cash
value for the fiscal year tax roll, and in accordance with the Department of Revenue’s
requirements as well as the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practices nationally
recognized techniques of appraising property; the assessor or his authorized agents or employees
may, after reasonable notice, enter upon said property, lands, waters and premises, not including
buildings, in the commonwealth, and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass. Nothing in this
of 2

section shall relieve an assessor of liability for damage caused by entry to said property, by
himself or his agents or employees.
of 2